Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.820

Revenues derived from certain university lands and income from university permanent fund deposited in University of Washington bond retirement fund—RCW 79.64.040 not affected.

Nothing contained in RCW 28B.20.800 through 28B.20.820 and RCW 43.79.201 is intended to amend or modify RCW 79.64.040 (section 4, chapter 178, Laws of 1961).

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.820. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 135 s 5. Formerly RCW 28.77.650.]